Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-220
Board of Regents; authority to expend money.

To enable the Board of Regents to carry out the provisions of sections 85-216 to 85-219, it is hereby authorized to expend such amount of money as it deems necessary from any money hereafter appropriated to carry out the spirit and intent of said sections.

Laws 1943, c. 5, § 5, p. 61;

R.S.1943, § 85-220.